District of Columbia statutes.
7-1208.03

Authority of the Commission on Mental Health.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to the operations of the Commission on Mental Health.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 803, 25 DCR 5055

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2073.
1973 Ed., § 6-1645.

Prior Codifications